Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 36B Georgia Caregivers Act

Effective date.

This Chapter became effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references.

Advance directives for health care, §

31-32-1

et seq.

Georgia Family Caregiver Support, §

49-6-70

et seq.

31-36B-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Caregivers Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-36B-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 584, § 1/HB 1304.

31-36B-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Aftercare” means any assistance provided by a lay caregiver to an individual under this chapter after the patient’s discharge from a hospital, including tasks that are limited to the patient’s condition at the time of discharge and do not require a licensed professional.

“Discharge” means a patient’s exit or release from a hospital to the patient’s residence after any inpatient stay.

“Hospital” means any institution classified and having a permit as a hospital from the Department of Community Health pursuant to this title and such department’s rules and regulations.

“Lay caregiver” means any individual 18 years of age or older, including next of kin, who is identified by the patient as someone who will provide aftercare assistance to the patient in the event the patient is discharged from the hospital.

“Residence” means a dwelling considered by a patient to be his or her home, not including an institution as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of Code Section 31-7-1.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-36B-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 584, § 1/HB 1304.

31-36B-3.
Lay caregiver involvement in discharge.

Upon inpatient admission to a hospital, each patient shall have the opportunity to identify at least one lay caregiver to be involved in the discharge planning process.

A patient may elect to change his or her lay caregiver by notifying the hospital of such change.

Identification of a lay caregiver by a patient under this chapter does not obligate any individual to perform any aftercare tasks for the patient.

This Code section shall not be construed so as to require a patient to identify any individual as a lay caregiver.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-36B-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 584, § 1/HB 1304.

31-36B-4.
Hospital notification to lay caregiver; education and training on aftercare.

If a patient or a person authorized to consent to medical treatment, in accordance with Code Section 31-9-2, has identified a lay caregiver under this chapter, a hospital shall notify the lay caregiver of the patient’s discharge to the patient’s residence, discharge to a post-acute healthcare facility, or transfer to another hospital as soon as practicable. If the hospital is unable to contact the lay caregiver, the lack of contact shall not interfere with, delay, or otherwise affect the medical care provided to the patient or an appropriate discharge of the patient.

As soon as practicable prior to the discharge of the patient, the hospital shall actively engage the patient and the identified lay caregiver in discharge planning tailored to the patient’s individual aftercare needs in order to provide the patient and the lay caregiver the necessary education and training regarding the aftercare needs of the patient.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-36B-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 584, § 1/HB 1304.

31-36B-5.
Healthcare decision making by lay caregiver; no delay in care; responsibilities.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to interfere with the rights of a patient or other person legally authorized to make healthcare decisions under Chapter 32 of this title, the “Georgia Advance Directive for Health Care Act,” or under Code Section 31-9-2, or to grant healthcare decision-making authority to a lay caregiver.

Nothing in this chapter shall delay the appropriate discharge or transfer of a patient.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to interfere with or supersede a healthcare provider’s instructions regarding a Medicare certified home health agency or any other post-acute care provider.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to create a private right of action against a hospital, hospital employee, or duly authorized agent of the hospital, or otherwise supersede or replace existing rights or remedies under any other general or special law.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to conflict with or replace the Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services Conditions of Participation.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-36B-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 584, § 1/HB 1304.